New.aff
PFX Q 0 kanaaba .
PFX Q 0 kanaagu .
PFX Q 0 kanaagi .
PFX Q 0 kanaazi .
PFX Q 0 kanaaki .
PFX Q 0 kanaabi .
PFX Q 0 kanaali .
PFX Q 0 kanaaga .
PFX Q 0 kanaaka .
PFX Q 0 kanaabu .
PFX Q 0 kanaalu .
PFX Q 0 kanaaku .
PFX Q 0 kanaatu .
PFX Q 0 akanaan [^lmn]
PFX Q l akanaand l.[^mn]
PFX Q l akanaann l.[mn]
PFX Q w akanaamp [w]
PFX Q 0 akanaamu .
PFX Q 0 akanaaba .
PFX Q 0 akanaagu .
PFX Q 0 akanaagi .
PFX Q 0 akanaazi .
PFX Q 0 akanaaki .
PFX Q 0 akanaabi .
PFX Q 0 akanaali .
PFX Q 0 akanaaga .
PFX Q 0 akanaaka .
PFX Q 0 akanaabu .
PFX Q 0 akanaalu .
PFX Q 0 akanaaku .
PFX Q 0 akanaatu .
PFX Q 0 bunaan [^lmn]
PFX Q l bunaand l.[^mn]
PFX Q l bunaann l.[mn]
PFX Q w bunaamp [w]
PFX Q 0 bunaamu .
PFX Q 0 bunaaba .
PFX Q 0 bunaagu .
PFX Q 0 bunaagi .
PFX Q 0 bunaazi .
PFX Q 0 bunaaki .
PFX Q 0 bunaabi .
PFX Q 0 bunaali .
PFX Q 0 bunaaga .
PFX Q 0 bunaaka .
PFX Q 0 bunaabu .
PFX Q 0 bunaalu .
PFX Q 0 bunaaku .
PFX Q 0 bunaatu .
PFX Q 0 obunaan [^lmn]
PFX Q l obunaand l.[^mn]
PFX Q l obunaann l.[mn]
PFX Q w obunaamp [w]
PFX Q 0 obunaamu .
PFX Q 0 obunaaba .
PFX Q 0 obunaagu .
PFX Q 0 obunaagi .
PFX Q 0 obunaazi .
PFX Q 0 obunaaki .
PFX Q 0 obunaabi .
PFX Q 0 obunaali .
PFX Q 0 obunaaga .
PFX Q 0 obunaaka .
PFX Q 0 obunaabu .
PFX Q 0 obunaalu .
PFX Q 0 obunaaku .
PFX Q 0 obunaatu .
PFX Q 0 lunaan [^lmn]
PFX Q l lunaand l.[^mn]
PFX Q l lunaann l.[mn]
PFX Q w lunaamp [w]
PFX Q 0 lunaamu .
PFX Q 0 lunaaba .
PFX Q 0 lunaagu .
PFX Q 0 lunaagi .
PFX Q 0 lunaazi .
PFX Q 0 lunaaki .
PFX Q 0 lunaabi .
PFX Q 0 lunaali .
PFX Q 0 lunaaga .
PFX Q 0 lunaaka .
PFX Q 0 lunaabu .
PFX Q 0 lunaalu .
PFX Q 0 lunaaku .
PFX Q 0 lunaatu .
PFX Q 0 olunaan [^lmn]
PFX Q l olunaand l.[^mn]
PFX Q l olunaann l.[mn]
PFX Q w olunaamp [w]
PFX Q 0 olunaamu .
PFX Q 0 olunaaba .
PFX Q 0 olunaagu .
PFX Q 0 olunaagi .
PFX Q 0 olunaazi .
PFX Q 0 olunaaki .
PFX Q 0 olunaabi .
PFX Q 0 olunaali .
PFX Q 0 olunaaga .
PFX Q 0 olunaaka .
PFX Q 0 olunaabu .
PFX Q 0 olunaalu .
PFX Q 0 olunaaku .
PFX Q 0 olunaatu .
PFX Q 0 kunaan [^lmn]
PFX Q l kunaand l.[^mn]
PFX Q l kunaann l.[mn]
PFX Q w kunaamp [w]
PFX Q 0 kunaamu .
PFX Q 0 kunaaba .
PFX Q 0 kunaagu .
PFX Q 0 kunaagi .
PFX Q 0 kunaazi .
PFX Q 0 kunaaki .
PFX Q 0 kunaabi .
PFX Q 0 kunaali .
PFX Q 0 kunaaga .
PFX Q 0 kunaaka .
PFX Q 0 kunaabu .
PFX Q 0 kunaalu .
PFX Q 0 kunaaku .
PFX Q 0 kunaatu .
PFX Q 0 okunaan [^lmn]
PFX Q l okunaand l.[^mn]
PFX Q l okunann l.[mn]
PFX Q w okunaamp [w]
PFX Q 0 okunaamu .
PFX Q 0 okunaaba .
PFX Q 0 okunaagu .
PFX Q 0 okunaagi .
PFX Q 0 okunaazi .
PFX Q 0 okunaaki .
PFX Q 0 okunaabi .
PFX Q 0 okunaali .
PFX Q 0 okunaaga .
PFX Q 0 okunaaka .
PFX Q 0 okunaabu .
PFX Q 0 okunaalu .
PFX Q 0 okunaaku .
PFX Q 0 okunaatu .
PFX Q 0 otunaan [^lmn]
PFX Q l otunaand l.[^mn]
PFX Q l otunaann l.[mn]
PFX Q w otunaamp [w]
PFX Q 0 otunaamu .
PFX Q 0 otunaaba .
PFX Q 0 otunaagu .
PFX Q 0 otunaagi .
PFX Q 0 otunaazi .
PFX Q 0 otunaaki .
PFX Q 0 otunaabi .
PFX Q 0 otunaali .
PFX Q 0 otunaaga .
PFX Q 0 otunaaka .
PFX Q 0 otunaabu .
PFX Q 0 otunaalu .
PFX Q 0 otunaaku .
PFX Q 0 otunaatu .
